<comment>You need a magical story book to tell you that you should be a nice guy?  Well, good on you for not going the other way with it.  I guess.</comment>

<comment>Atheists don't need to be jerks, do they?</comment>

<comment>No. Some are, some aren't. They're like everyone else you meet, and they have a broad variety of personalities and command of the facts, just like religious believers.</comment>

<comment>And as in most categories, the trolls are over represented online.</comment>

<comment>i.e. I am hypocritical enough to judge believers [ i.e. gay marriage, etc], but not atheists for being just as intolerant.You should have been a politician, liberal..</comment>

<comment>Feel the outrage, Tea Dolt!</comment>

<comment>Speaking of jerks...</comment>

<comment>Strange way of announcing your presence, Nadine.</comment>

<comment>Atheists are slightly less popular than used car salesman/lawyers who lead Teaparty chapters. For those who spend time online, some of that unpopularity is because they tend to be a-holes. Outside online, they do things like place statues of Baphomet.As for the post, I stopped at "Jesus calls his followers to care for those on the fringes of society: the poor, orphans, immigrants, and other disenfranchised groups."I've recently read John and most of Matthew (in Koine) and I don't recall anything in there about immigrants. Maybe I missed it; maybe it's in another book. Or, maybe just maybe, Erin Kotlan is pretending a version of the (misread) "ger" from the O.T. appeared in the N.T.I'd imagine Jesus would realize the downsides of illegal immig. - ones you won't hear from either the MSM or those in the Trump sphere - and wouldn't support either it or mass immigration. He'd realize that the support for both is based on corruption and a desire to make money or obtain power no matter the human cost.</comment>

<comment>Jesus was an immigrant/refugee as an infant. -- Remember the flight into Egypt?  And I'm sure they didn't have papers and permission.Most of the major figures in the Bible were at some point in their lives undocumented political and/or economic refugees.God cares about the stranger and the sojourner.God's messengers usually come as uninvited strangers. And there are special laws that speak to how the children of Israel are to treat the stranger and the sojourner -- they are to be specially respectful and mindful of them in remembrance of the time (400 years) when the children of Israel were sojourners in Egypt.When Jesus sends out his disciples to share the word, they are sent out in pairs as strangers and sojourners who bring nothing with them.I think all too often we here in America are afraid of the strangers who come to sojourn with us in remembrance of our own shameful history of how our European ancestors sojourned with the Native Americans. Probably America's issues with immigration won't really settle until we fully reckon with that history and it's aftermath.</comment>

<comment>wow. beautifully said, sandra.</comment>

<comment>Those are just Jim Wallis/Big Business talking points. When faced with an argument it's helpful to try to determine "cui bono?" In Sandra's case, those who'd profit include the Koch bros, USChamber, WalMart, McDonald's, Tyson Foods, etc. etc. Those who'd be harmed are most non-wealthy Americans.</comment>

<comment>You're being quite disingenuous here.How would open borders or what you call "amnesty" benefit the wealthy?If immigrants are all granted legal status, those wealthy businessmen would no longer be able to exploit immigrant labor. They would have to pay them the prevailing wages, taxes, health insurance, etc.If, as many anti-immigrant folk argue (and which has some basis in fact), a large number of "illegal immigrants" had significantly less education than the average American, what benefit would there be to a business owner to hire them if they have to pay them the same?You are not arguing against "amnesty" or reform or even open borders; you are arguing against the status quo.Pro-immigration advocates are as much, if not more, opposed to the status quo as you.I don't want ANY "illegal immigrants" in the country; I want them all legalized. I don't want a second class status for anyone, which is what your buddies at Koch Brothers, Tyson foods, etc. really want. </comment>

<comment>magister ludi asks: "How would open borders or what you call "amnesty" benefit the wealthy?"Why don't you ask them? The Koch bros fund loose/open borders groups like Reason Mag. The WSJ had a famous editorial saying: "we propose a five-word constitutional amendment: There shall be open borders."As for the rest, I've already told you that your talking point is wrong. I did that w/o providing a link, but here's a page going into more detail on how you're wrong:24ahead.com/s/immigration-wage...We do agree on one thing: the Kochs etc. would prefer a serf class. What you're too corrupt or dumb to admit is that your policies would give them what they want.</comment>

<comment>I asked YOU and you don't seem to have an answer.Don't be so foolish as to think I would follow an unsolicited link, especially that just coincidentally has the same name as your username.What kind of link is that? "Here, I said it, and if you don't believe me, here's a link to my source where I said it before."So, again, if immigrants are granted legal status and thus employers would be required to pay them the prevailing wage, insurance, etc., how does that hurt other workers?You do realize that job growth has been so much that we now have employers who can't find qualified workers. By your sky is falling theory, the fact that there are some 12 million undocumented immigrants in the country, the supply of workers should exceed the demand; yet we have the opposite situation.Can you explain how those immigrants currently in the country, if legalized, would hurt others? And please don't put links up; only fools follow unsolicited links. Just state your argument herehere and I will respond to it here.</comment>

<comment>"magister ludi" says: "Don't be so foolish as to think I would follow an unsolicited link, especially that just coincidentally has the same name as your username."How interesting. Someone - perhaps "magister ludi", perhaps not - recently used the same phrase. I'll have to look that up to help refresh my sockpuppet database. Another sockpuppet - "OwlieBub" - recently said at this site "The most recent Colbert post on 24ahead.com is from 2010, and it appears that you wrote it." (voted up by hed1117, Darrel Jones, Bill_G, and commentary).For everyone else, the answer to ludi's questions are at the link, and the link shows just how wrong he is.</comment>

<comment>Don't waste your time. I freely admit that it was most likely I who wrote it before. I write more or less the same time someone tries to sucker me into clicking on their link.I guess I could just flag those posts that include links, but that's not my style. If someone is foolish enough to open themselves to malware or whatever, that's their problem.The fact that you are so insistent that people click on your links is even more suspect. "Come into my parlor, said the spider to the fly."Post your boring, fallacious, tired arguments here or just give up. No one is going to follow your link.</comment>

<comment>"magister ludi": You're obviously foolish enough to open yourself up to a libel suit with your false implication about my 15-year-old political site. I'll give you a chance to retract your false implication, unless you'd like to meet me in court.</comment>

<comment>You win the "Desperate Post of the Year Award" as well as the "Attack on Free Speech" award.Libel? That's hilarious. Are you suggesting I don't have the right to criticize your opinions or your alleged 15-year old nonsense site?I know nothing of your political site nor care. Not knowing if your supposed site is even real, I have every right to suspect unsolicited links. Do you deny that hackers use fake links in order to introduce malware or what not? Bear in mind that many sites don't allow posters to post links for just that reason.If you want to go to court, have your lawyer contact mine.Now, I suggested elsewhere that your obsession with immigration implies that the issue is somehow deeper than many of your red herring arguments suggest. Most people are not so obsessed with the issue, regardless of their position.A perusal of your profile showed me two things: one, you definitely are obsessed with immigration; and two, you are a nativist, possibly a white supremacist.One quote: "...the name change [of Mt. McKinley/ Denali] is yet another slap in the face to white people and U.S. tradition. Obama's sweeping away the Dead White Male past and replacing it with a new, not so white future.."I have some problems with this.First, how is changing the name BACK to it's Native American name a "slap in the face to white people"? Must all the world be named after white people? Does showing respect for the even longer traditions of the Native Americans imply disrespect to white people?What about the "slap in the face" to the natives of Alaska when their sacred mountain was coopted and named after a white guy from Ohio? Is it possible to raise up one people without having to lower another?Also, what is wrong with having a "not so white future"? Does that scare you, make you uncomfortable?Well, you know what? That "not so white future" is coming regardless of anything Obama does. You might as well get used to it.I'm sorry that this disturbs you, but it's reality. I, for one, welcome that future and I'm "white". Perhaps after you lose the libel suit we could become friends and I will show you how to let go of your fear.</comment>

<comment>A wonderful recitation of Jim Wallis/Big Business talking points. I should have been clearer in my comment: when did Jesus say anything about immigrants?What you're unwittingly proposing is untenable: you want completely open borders. If we didn't have completely open borders, then we wouldn't be welcoming the stranger (according to you). Those completely open borders would have unbelievably negative impacts on everyone.If you now would like to backtrack and support something less than completely open borders, then please tell us what your limits would be. How would you decide that someone gets to come here and someone doesn't?</comment>

<comment>I think Jesus would have found the mere dividing of God's children into "us and them" abhorrent."Illegal immigration" only exists because men have made national borders and made laws to defend those borders. </comment>

<comment>Oddly enough, Jesus divided people into one group or another many times. There's nothing inherently wrong with wanting to give your group more benefits than another group.What impact would the completely open borders you support have on everyone?</comment>

<comment>Sure, he divided people into groups, insomuch as he recognized the groups they themselves divided people into (Pharisees, Sadducees, Romans, tax collectors, prostitutes, Jews, Gentiles, Samarians, etc.), but he clearly taught that, despite those artificial groupings, all were God's children.What effect would open borders have on everyone?It would make all humans "us", and not "us" and "them".It MAY mean some would have to give up some of their wealth or their power, but what do people need with so much wealth and power, especially when having it creates such discord and, ultimately, leads to violence and war?</comment>

<comment>It must be great in your fantasy world, but open borders wouldn't lead to a magical wonderland. It would lead to more discord and more violence. For instance, as various powers carved up the U.S. and fought for control. You're a traitor, proposing what would be in effect an invasion of the U.S. as countries like China, Brazil, India, and Russia tried to send as many people as they could in order to obtain as much power as possible.Opposing illegal immigration doesn't mean that one is denying that illegal aliens are God's children (or one's equivalent). It just means not espousing policies that would make things much, much worse.</comment>

<comment>So, you imagine you know that Jesus wouldn't care about illegal immigrants.  LOL, sure, sure.  Just like he would never associate with prostitutes.  You're not even Christian (and I say that as someone who is no longer Christian himself, but who at least knew what it meant when I was one).</comment>

<comment>You're lying about what I said. Which, of course, isn't surprising: amnesty fans can't help but lie.I'm sure Jesus would care about illegal aliens. That doesn't mean he'd support illegal immigration.To put that into present terms, someone like the Pervert Protector (Mahony) could care greatly about an illegal alien's welfare and want the best for that person. At the same time, he could counsel the illegal alien to return home. Instead - because he's corrupt - Mahony wants as many illegal aliens as possible despite all the many downsides. Those downsides include people dying in the desert, something that could be lessened without those like Mahony encouraging them to cross.</comment>

<comment>No, I absolutely did not lie about what you said, but it's a total lie to claim that I did.  You've lost all credibility by leading off with (much like your heroes in Congress), "You lie!"    In fact, you wrote, "I'd imagine Jesus would realize the downsides of illegal immig.", which leaves it unclear whether "immig." refers to immigrants or immigration.  Not that it makes much difference - you're still presuming to know what Jesus thinks about the topic (any topic), which is hubris, and shows you as the ahole you are.</comment>

<comment>Here's what I wrote: "I'd imagine Jesus would realize the downsides of illegal immig. - ones you won't hear from either the MSM or those in the Trump sphere - and wouldn't support either it or mass immigration."I suggest English lessons, because it should be obvious what "immig." referred to. Either you don't understand English (obviously not likely) or you lied.</comment>

<comment>No, not all. But that one dude Brady, apparently does. I'm actually agnostic, and thought it was a great article. I was raised Catholic, and honestly, the reason I left the church, and thinking about things differently, was because I didn't feel like people lived up to what we were taught about Bible. I think a lot more people would be... less offended by other's belief, if they were more like the young person who wrote this article. I couldn't get past how many of my fellow parishioners, were all about helping the poor, and meekness, and willingness to help others... until they walked out of the church doors, where they reverted to selfish, money grubbing, ignoramus. It really bothered me.</comment>

<comment>As an agnostic to you ever feel you're just fence sitting?  Do you ever feel the need to shit or get off the pot, metaphorically speaking, as an agnostic?</comment>

<comment>Agnosticism doesn't mean someone is hedging their bets, or just can't decide whether they believe in god or not.  It's a philosophical position regarding the knowability of metaphysical claims. http://www.philosophybasics.co...</comment>

<comment>That is correct; however, Constance makes a good point.I too am agnostic philosophically. It is arrogant and intellectually dishonest to say that I know with one hundred percent certainty whether or not some "god" or "supreme being" (that is, some entity that exists outside the physical universe and that acts without being limited by physical laws; i.e. "supernatural") exists.However, if it's not playing "semantics" a little too much, I say one should indeed "take a side"."Theism" means that one BELIEVES a god exists. "Atheism" means that one BELIEVES that no god exists.I believe no god exists, thus I am an atheist. I accept, however, that I could be wrong, so I am thus also an agnostic.It is dogmatic belief that is logically untenable.Then again, maybe I am just playing with semantics.</comment>

<comment>Actually, no, atheism does NOT mean, "... one believes that no god exists".  Not to split hairs, but atheism (from the Greek, a- theos) means a lack of belief in god.  That is, you don't actively believe that there is no god, you merely lack belief in god.  Atheism, therefore, is the default position into which humans are born (we're not born believing in any particular god, we are taught those beliefs by our parents).As for taking sides - that's a ridiculous position to take, when there are many who simply aren't sure, and think that either "side" may be right, but they don't have enough information to decide.</comment>

<comment>What ridiculous hair splitting!"Atheism means a lack of belief in god".How is that substantially different than believing there exists no god? You will notice I say "believe no god exists" and not "do not believe in God". The second construct presupposes that God does in fact exist, but atheists simply refuse to believe it.Your construct of an atheist "lacking belief in god" also presupposes the existence of god; the atheist merely "lacks belief" in that god.And a-theos does not mean, "lack of belief in god". The prefix " a-" means simply "without" or "lack of"; the       "-theos"  means "god". Nothing in the word-- neither in Greek nor in English-- means "belief". Thus, "atheism" means the belief (the suffix "-ism" implies a belief system) of a-theos.It should be noted that a-theos was also used as a slur, in which case it meant "godless", rather than referring to a belief system.I find it rather insulting to be told that my atheism is not a positive belief; that it is merely a "default position". That sounds as if developing my belief was not really a rational exploration but merely a negation of my education. It's just "rebel without a cause" childishness.I think many people do embrace the atheist label because they simply want to rebel against religion, but that is not my position. As I noted above, philosophically I am agnostic, but I strongly believe that no "supernatural deity" exists; it is a positive belief, not a lack of belief. In fact, I believe that NOTHING exists outside of the phenomenal universe: no souls, no spirits, no ghosts, no "higher powers", nothing.That said, I do not believe our concept of the " phenomenal universe" is anywhere near being complete. We may not know whether the Laws of Physics as we know them today hold in all of the universe. In fact, I use the word "universe" when perhaps I should use the now trendy word, "multiverse".It is conceivable that some intelligent being may not be bound by the Laws of Physics by which we are bound, BUT that does not mean that being is outside the Laws of Physics; it merely means our Laws of Physics are not expansive enough to explain that being's existence.For example, let's assume that our universe is only one bubble in a much larger (infinite) multiverse. In some of the other bubbles, different Laws may exist.We don't know if those universes can interact with ours, but possibly they can. Possibly (to get Twilight Zone-ish), our universe was actually created in the laboratory of some higher intelligence in one of the other universes.In that case, that Creator Scientist from Another Universe would be like a god to us. However, I still say he is NOT supernatural. He is bound by the Laws of his universe and those of the infinite multiverse (if it makes sense to speak of Laws for the multiverse). He is a natural being even if we cannot comprehend his nature.The world rests upon the back of a turtle and it's turtles all the way down. But not one of those turtles is the Supreme Turtle.And, as to the question of "taking sides", I don't mean to be dogmatic about that either. Certainly some people are, as you say, "simply not sure". That is a valid position and I don't mean to criticize those who are in that position.What I was referring to is the people who DO have a positive belief, whether in atheism or theism, but refuse to acknowledge that positive belief, for fear of sounding uncritical or not adequately skeptical. I find that to be a bit wishy-washy.That is why I clarify that, yes, I believe that no god exists, but I still am agnostic insomuch as I recognize I could be wrong; the "extraordinary evidence" may be forthcoming.</comment>

<comment>You wrote, " And a-theos does not mean, "lack of belief in god". The prefix " a-" means simply "without" or "lack of"; the       "-theos"  means 'god'. "That's almost exactly what I wrote, with you only taking issue with the word "belief" that I used.  However, since the word started off as a slur against those who denied the gods of the Greeks, it actually did refer to those who did not believe in the gods.  Meaning is not always a literal parsing of the component parts of a word - and I think you're being pedantic by trying to parse a-theos that way.Further - there is a difference between lacking belief in a god, and actively believing that there is no god, just as lacking the hobby of collecting stamps is not the same as having a hobby of "not collecting stamps".  Collecting stamps is a hobby, not collecting stamps is not a hobby.  Believing there is a god is a belief; not believing a god is not a belief, it's the lack of one.  Words matter, use the right ones.</comment>

<comment>You are correct that it is not much different than what you said. You yourself admitted, indirectly, that you were splitting hairs.Now you complain that I split those same hairs more finely!The problem is with the issue of belief. You're attempting to argue from etymology-- that a-theos means lack of belief in god-- so I'm pointing out that the modern English understanding of "atheism" denotes an active belief; it is a word with a definition distinct from the definition of "godless", both of which would have been a-theos in Greek (as far as I know; I don't claim to be an expert on ancient Greek).You are arguing that "godless" and "atheist" are the same thing, which of course, would make the slur "godless atheist" not only ridiculous but redundant.In your third paragraph, you almost get it right, but I think you realized you were about to surrender the argument, so you made a quick u-turn and contradicted yourself.To wit: "there is a difference between lacking a belief in a god, and actively believing that there is no god..."Precisely. That is what I have been saying all along. I have an "active" belief that there is no god (I think "positive belief" is more accurate than "active belief). That is what I call "atheism".However, as I said, some people who, as you say, merely "lack belief in a god" embrace the mantle of atheist. That is their right, but I don't call that rational atheism; it's, as you say, a default position.Now, at the end of that last paragraph you contradict your first sentence. You say, "believing there is a god is a belief; not believing [there is] a god is not a belief, it's the lack of one."You first admitted that one could have an "active" (or positive) belief that there is no god, but then you backtrack and insist that not believing in a god is the lack of belief.You were right in your first assertion; there was no need for retreat.Now, let me give you another example: I could say that I don't believe China exists. Why? Because I've never seen it.That would be the lack of belief.On the other hand, I could say, "I have traveled all around the world. I have studied history books both ancient and modern. I have spoken with people who claim to be from China, as well as people who live in the region where China supposedly lie. I have studied ancient and modern maps, read travelers' journals and spoken with government officials."After many years of studying the question of China's existence, I have come to the conclusion that, in fact, the existence of China has been part legend, part longstanding hoax and part government conspiracy. I could find no convincing evidence as to the existence of China.If some extraordinary evidence does exist, I have not been able to find it, despite all my efforts."However wrong that belief may be, it is not the "lack of belief"; it is a positive belief developed through rigorous examination of the available evidence.Your stamp collection analogy is a false analogy. I could have a hobby, for instance, of destroying stamps or throwing out stamp collections. That would indeed be a hobby, albeit a rather odd one.Sorry, but you fail to convince. That is not to say "I have a lack of belief" in your opinion.No, I "actively" and positively believe your opinion is false.</comment>

<comment>As someone who also grew up Catholic before becoming staunchly Atheist then moving to being Agnostic, I find it bizarre for people to make this argument that you're fence sitting. There is literally zero evidence either way. I know it's not as fun as being part of "Team God" or "Team No God", but it honestly makes the most sense, so enjoy your shitting I suppose.</comment>

<comment>I don't know, is a perfectly valid response. If you don't know, it is dishonest to answer otherwise. If someone says they are agnostic, I take them at their word.</comment>

<comment>The notion that the lack of evidence either way means it might be true is logically flawed.  Extraordinary claims *do* require evidence to be elevated to the level of "maybe."There is zero evidence that Russell's teapot orbits the sun also.  Are you undecided about that?My sense is that agnostics are simply unwilling to suffer the disapproval of believers who are offended by atheism.</comment>

<comment>The argument regarding Russell's teapot exists within this physical world. The argument about a being that exists outside any dimension we can understand is something entirely different. I honestly don't care about any disapproval of believers.</comment>

<comment>Some say Russell's teapot is not there, because it has not been observed, but others say that it is a metaphysical teapot that only believers can see.But seriously...  the existence of a being outside of any dimension we can understand is without any foundation.  While one cannot prove it is not true, the maintenance of "maybe" on this question is not justified. It is, by definition, an extraordinary claim that requires extraordinary evidence to rationally consider.It's no less extraordinary than the claim that there is an invisible, metaphysical teapot orbiting between Mars and Jupiter that governs your life.  Are you agnostic about that teapot? Are you agnostic about Zeus?  Shiva?  Thor?  The Flying Spaghetti Monster?  On what basis do you maintain "maybe" about the God of the Bible but not these as well?</comment>

<comment>I said nothing about the God of the Bible. Surely that is nonsense.</comment>

<comment>OK.  Having not responded to you, I can only assume you didn't, unless you're also @JustPruitt</comment>

<comment>no we are not . Right now I would say i am more agnostic, but I don't care what others think of me. You sir are as prejudiced as those same believers who disapprove of you.</comment>

<comment>How does one go from " grow up Catholic but become staunchly atheist" unless what you really mean is that you were raised according to the faith of your patent(s) but have since found it simpler to fully autonomize, completely escape parental controls and do nothing in search of your higher power.  Welcome to the crowd?Or were you one of those really clever people who thrived on anti-catholic rhetoric to support the Church's strangle hold on your free will? Or is the traditional concept of a Creator - God just something that dorsn't make sense to your scientific mind?So, do you also not believe the historical account of the God - Man bunk?  That 12 backwater hayseed fisherman who deserted and denied Jesus would later, after the resurrention, plant the seeds of Christianity so well that it continues to grow throughout the world...almost like the 2nd Big Bang.Strangely, even science can't explain how Something as simple as Nothing is the Prime Mover.</comment>

<comment>Apparently you must have naively thought that Catholics were a different sort of sinner much like some Protestants think Catholics aren't Christian.Remember when Jesus winnowed his followers for the first time: Bread of Life discourse.  He continues to winnow.  If you haven't yet rethought your free will action of leaving Mother Church based on your personal judgements of others, I would recommend rethinking your motives.  To condemn others of being hypocrite seats one among many...just in a different locale.  Become a Convinced Catholic.  Read about your faith and pray fervently for Faith.  Bigotry and Reason have one thing in common: they leave off where Faith picks up.Remember Jesus said, "My Body is True Food.  Unless you eat My Flesh and drink My Blood you have no life in you."Do not winnow in your faith!  Learn it and live it.</comment>

<comment>Wtf are you on about? Best get your prescription refilled...</comment>

<comment>I take it you you didn't get the memo.  It's called the Markian Secret.  </comment>

<comment>I guess I don't get the nonsense and fairy tales memos. I doubt I'm missing much, aside from the chance to sound like a total loon.</comment>

<comment>Markian Secret comes from New Testament (NT) Gospel of Mark.  Thought the this gospel, Jesus performs signs and miracles and is continuously telling His followers and the people " not to tell anyone" (mostlikely because 'His Time' had not come yet).However, since the Day of His Resurrection, His secret's out.  Mary Magdalen was the first to proclaim it.  And, like you, many didn't believe her.Ever ready any Pascal?  He was a famous atheist who convinced himself of his own error.  It's called the Pascal Wager.Oh, by the way, the Markian Secret's been out for over 2000 years - Jesus Christ is risen!  Hallelujah!</comment>

<comment>Okay then... You should definitely not skip your meds anymore.</comment>

<comment>My wife tells me that, too!  It's really amazing how the mind works.  Many years ago I read Cervantes "Don Quioxte" and the Ford light bulb switches from 20 to 100 watts (flash) - so that's where all the comedic, dynamic duo/duets come from.  Cervantes would have made much Dinero in radio and TV. Oops, I see Mike got the best of me.  Here, let us switch channels...QUIT. I can do it by myself I don't need your help, thank you!Ok, back to you!  How did you develop the moniker RELIGINISPOISON?..</comment>

<comment>I've spent a bit of time listening to the religious, particularly those of Christian denominations. The rest of the story wrote itself.</comment>

<comment>Time listening: I assume you mean listening but not understanding.  Jesus uses the term, "those who have ears need to hear."  What are your objections to religion?  You must realize that nearly all people have some form of religious ethic.</comment>

<comment>Oh I fully understand. All of these fairy tales are A. fiction and B. twisted to suit the narrative of history's worst abuses. Religion is an outdated method of controlling an ignorant populace with magical stories substituted for understanding of the natural world around us. Make no mistake, Mike, religion is a poison.</comment>

<comment>I'm going to assume you only believe in the here & now and no life beyond the material grave.What drives your inspiration for looking forward, to achievement, and various successes you may accomplish?What motivates you to remain in this world knowing full well that you aren't promised tomorrow?If you say power or $$, that seems to be the baseline you infer on religion.  Without a srong religious tenet there would be absolute chaos. Why do you obey the law...assuming you do?  All these laws stem from the Decalogue.Why do/did you honor your parent(s)?  That comes from the 4th Word. Why don't you kill that one person on your personal hit list?  5th Word. If you have a hit list you must know, give the right circumstances, and shit does not just happen, you'd probably off them.There are enate laws given to us all from birth.  Most communities were close knit communities whose actions were governed by some deitic activity.  Because most organized religion was a urban culture, the term Pagan described the country folk and their various cultic practices.  But, it was Community that was the main tool used to guide it citizens.  It started in the family.  If the 2 members who start the family do not properly school their children insofar as the community needs, Houston, we have a problem.This problem started long ago with the break-up of family.  Here's a premise that holds true of anyone: you can not expect someone to teach you something they don't know!  TV evangelicals may parrot verses of biblical text but we are challenged to check the fruit of the tree.No one can save you except Jesus Christ.  And He won't do it in spite of your opinion: you have to ask.I would recommend reading some (good) liturature.  Start with the most obtuse reaction you have toward a religion then find a refutation.  I'd got big with the Catholic Church because all Christian sects stem from the Reformation and are only several hundred years old where the Church dates back 2 milliniums but even further with its Judeo-Christian foundation.  If you need any suggestiing, ask.  First suggestion would be a NAB-REVISED bible.  No, not King James or Gideon or Luthern.  NAB-Revised gives you a whole lot more data with history and circumstances, like why did the Hebrews wander around the desert for 40 years!  They pissed Yahwah off...again.  Same reason Moses wasn't allowed into the Promised Land.  You read the bible you're in for a real treat.  We're still the same people wandering...and still piss in Him off.</comment>

<comment>Morality and purpose in life are not derived from works of fiction. Reading fiction can be a source of entertainment, learning, inspiration and self-discovery, however. No afterlife. No hit list, killing is pretty well universally frowned upon even among the irreligious (imagine that!) though many religious texts, the bible included, specifically condone killing.My eyes are open and that's why I disbelieve. Circular logic (which is all religions have as 'evidence') proves nothing. You can state that the Bible is true because the Bible says that the Bible is true because the Bible says that... You get my point, I assume.</comment>

<comment>Putting aside the ancient Hebrew writings, and the collected texts of the Apostles together with the recent discovery of the Qumran Scrolls (Dead Sea) which support various books that make up the Canon of the Catholic Bible...putting aside the monumental movements of people in/out of captivity over hundreds & thousands of years, the building/destruction/rebuilding of Jerusalem, and all the obvious typology in the Old Testament being fulfilled in the New Testament, one would really have to have very stilted vision.  Even Mapquest isn't that obvious. You have experience with some things that require faith.  Say, for instance, a Stop Sign.  You enter and intersection which you know the opposing traffic is required to STOP...and you proceed.  Many people just cruise right thru without a 2nd thought because they know they have the right of way.  That's a form of faith although it can be proved to be misplaced.You have faith in some human beings: more in some less in others.  You had faith in your parents.Had does a non-believer handle the decline and death of a loved one.  We both feel the various aspects of grief.  But, why is that if Death is nothing more then the end of mortal life with nothing else.If anything makes no sense it is the months, maybe years, of crying over the lose of a spouse or a died child when all along you knew it ended this way.  And then the ancient religious rituals of burial.  Around here they collect all the refuse material stuff on Tuesdays, haul it to a transfer station and, I believe, it ends up at that huge incinerator at Baltimore. Here's a free app you can load to your phone (Laudate).  In it you will find some useful info whether you believe or not.  I used to (1) read about various Saints of the day, (2) Mass readings of the day, (3) various aspects of Catholic teachings in the Cathecism.  You can also read various Vatican documents on Faith & Morals.Now, here's a request I make of you and I have enough faith in what you've written that you will take my request to heart.  I'll ask you to change your moniker "ReligionisPoison" to something less onerous, like maybe "Nonbeliever" or "PaganHeart".I ask you this because I sincerely don't believe you would intentionally want to sway anyone's thought process in searching for their path in life. It would be like a pedophile grooming a child but, instead of violating the corporal person, you'd be influencing the life of their soul.  Give it some thought.Would also like to hear about any rational authors who support your view plus a counterpoint in refutation.  It would be interesting if years down the road you were to become a real movement in your current belief system. One more question - do you have children?</comment>

<comment>A 'movement' of sorts, or at least a definite shift has already begun. I have no desire to start one of my very own!http://www.bbc.com/news/world-...https://www.washingtonpost.com...I'm not intent on swaying anyone, my moniker, which will likely remain, is merely an accurate representation of my opinion of (all) religion. A good example of late would be Islam. Would you believe its teachings to be largely poisonous? How about Scientology or the twisted version of Christianity peddled by the Mormons? When 'fundamentalists' practice a religion's 'fundamentals' you get Westboro and ISIS, 9/11 and Charlie Hebdo, the Salem Witch Trials and the Spanish Inquisition, Mike Huckabee and Kim Davis. Is it the believers who are in the wrong or is it that the religion's 'fundamentals' are deeply and fundamentally flawed. There are many who have written about the fallacies and fatalities of the world's (most recently prominent) religions. I'll let you look for them yourself though, as you do seem quite intelligent and we've established that my opinions are just that, not an attempt to convert anyone. Cheers, Mike.</comment>

<comment>I'll pray for you and ask that you do what you do for me, too.  Best Wishes, ME!</comment>

<comment>Mikey G - I find it interesting that many who leave churches like RC, Mormonism, Scientology, etc., leave not because they question the mythology of a virgin birth or resurrection, golden tablets, or Xenu, 747's and Thetans, but because of claims of hypocrisy, or the community not treating the member well.  It tends to support the concept that the mythology is not as important as the community.  Therefore, if we could all agree that these are communities based on mythology, and such myths and their supporting texts are that - myths, not literal truths above all others - forming the basis of (somewhat) like minded communities, we could reduce conflict among religions and between the churches and state.</comment>

<comment>OR simply tax these con artists so heavily that relijun ceases to be highly profitable.</comment>

<comment>Religious texts are subject to interpretation. I don't think anything in a ancient text should be applied literally to modern culture and social aspects. However, there are philosophies and concepts that can be carried over. Obviously, there are those that interpret things literally, and the only cure for that is education. I think you are onto something though, I agree that it does seem to be more about the community, than the belief system. That can be both good, and dangerous. Depending on the beliefs being shared in that community. They kind of tie together, because it's their beliefs that a bonding them to that group. People are always looking for others of like mind, not just for companionship, but for reassurance, I think.</comment>

<comment>I think I missed "reassurance" in my analysis.  Good addition. Thanks for the comment.</comment>

<comment>Dear Carolannie, my response is not meant to be critical or mean-spirited in any way. What's the point of that? At the age of 75 I have learned there is not much I can say that changes a mind and so I begin with no expectation of that result. My objective is to simply provide another point of view, not just to you but to all my Christian brethren. I assume you are Christian from your remark "atheists." This is an excerpt from an mail sent to a friend who asked me to define God: You ask me to "define God." Is that even possible? Especiallyby a created being, like myself? How does the finite comprehend theInfinite? As I wrote above, I have no dispute with your description,but is that a complete definition of GOD? You and I are confined bytime and space, the God we worship exists outside time and space as well as filling the universe with His presence: "And he isbefore all things, and by him all things consist." Colossians1:17 God is not ONLY the Light of the world, it is His Power thatlights the universe. I was not necessarily disputing what youwrote earlier. And it only occurred to me as I answered your emailthat "separation of church and state" NEVER existed. TheTruth, as I wrote below, when Adam and eve were created, they werethe church and God was the "state." When satan entered theworld (the Garden) he offered the church, Adam and Eve, anotherstate, so to speak, and they chose "the state of satan"over the The State of God, and their descendants have been paying for their error ever since. Would you and I have chosen differently? Isuspect not. The Bible tells us "Jesus is the lamb slain fromthe foundation of the world." Why did Jesus, our kinsmanRedeemer, have to die? The Perfect sacrifice by our kinsman is andwas necessary to pay for the sin God knew was coming. It was sin that killed Jesus. Since He was slain from the foundation of the world,before Adam was created, God clearly foreknew man would choose satan over Him and He prepared the way back to Himself. Can you see that "separation of church and state" is simply another of satan's lies, like "atheism," "agnosticism," "deism," "evolution" and "religion," all corollary to satan's greatest lie, "I DO NOT EXIST!" God is abundantly clear when He wrote in Revelation 13:4 and 8, "And they worshipped the dragon (devil)...And all that dwell upon theearth shall worship him, whose names are not written in the book oflife of the Lamb slain from the foundation of the world." As Iwrote so many times before, you must be born again to have your name writ into the Book of Life (some say those names were written in the Book before Adam and Eve were created. I am open to learn more on that.)Revelation 13:4 & 8 is the key to what I wrote above, that "separation of church and state" is an impossible paradigm. If your name is in the Book of Life, you are a Christ/Yahweh/Yeshua/Jehovah worshiper. If your name IS NOT in that Book, you are a satan worshiper. God laid it out as clear as can be. How can you find "separation of church and state," "atheism," "agnosticism," "deism," "evolution" and "religion"  there?  According toGod's Word, they are false paradigms! They do not exist! They cannot exist! Christ/Yahweh/Yeshua/Jehovah, or satan! That's it, NO THIRD OPTION.</comment>

<comment>None of us knows who is and isn't written in the Book of Life.</comment>

<comment>Dear Mintdragon, Thank you for reading my post and responding. Jesus said "Ye must be born again" to see and to enter Heaven. And, I assume, to have your name written into the Book of Life of the Lamb. By the Grace of God (Jesus Christ) we have assurance of life eternal with God. I think Christianity without such assurance would be no different than the hundreds of thousands of "religions" made by men. I characterize "religion" as man's attempt to gain Heaven, but NONE of those "religions" offer the assurance of Heaven promised by Christianity. Heaven is reached One Way and only One Way, through our Creator, Lord and Savior, Jesus Christ.  I repeat what I wrote above, "religion," all "religion" is satanically inspired, Christianity is not "religion," it is a personal relationship with Jesus Christ, just as our first parents enjoyed in the Garden of Eden,</comment>

<comment>Nope, I am not a Christian, and wasn't raised one.  I am not affiliated with any religion. Many in my family are atheists. Respect towards people who struggle and reach for the good of mankind always engenders better outcomes than disrespect. I am probably closer to the Jane Goodall feeling about things, but can also see how people become atheists. But, to me, it is really a matter of indifference what 'religious' beliefs people have. The proof is in the pudding</comment>

<comment>I don't see what he said that makes him a jerk.  His comment goes to the heart of the matter:  The Bible is a book of myth that is full of self-contradictory statements, and believers can select verses to justify virtually any position.  This is why, during the Civil War, both abolitionists and slavers cited the Bible.  It's why about half of Christians approve of gay marriage and half do not.  It's why both Catholics and Protestants burned each other at the stake as heretics with a perfect sense of righteousness.What makes this possible is that the book is mythology, with no basis in fact, meaning that there is no basis for interpretation besides opinion.I'm reading the Bhagavad Gita right now.  In it Arjuna, at the head of a great army, hesitates, feeling guilt and dismay at the sense of slaughtering the army opposing him.  His religious guide Krishna tells him to go ahead with a full heart, because the dead will be reborn and none of earthly reality matters.  This is Hindu scripture. There's no Jesus in sight.How are these two any different?  Both are without any basis in fact. Both claim to represent the revealed truth.  With billions of believers, each has a similar claim to legitimacy.</comment>

<comment>Ah, that is an interesting passage. It came up in a class I was taking where we discussed whether non-Abrahamic religions have any justification for violence. They do. There's even Buddhist warrior-monks in a few places. We are human, we justify evil, whether in our religious tradition, or in our advocacy for a glorious utopia which will finally end all suffering. Believe me, all civilizations are a thin veneer over underlying potential barbarity.</comment>

<comment>And all of these religions are interchangeable in their lack of any factual basis.  When it comes to data, not one is more valid than belief in Zeus, Thor or Russell's teapot.  (Apparently there are still pockets of belief in Zeus and Thor.)</comment>

<comment>Atheism claims to be the truth too with no more basis in fact, but I don't make fun of them. Most of them come to their position through struggle and self-doubt. And I can't prove them wrong or right. And I understand about scriptural fallacies, and it certainly makes me wonder. But if someone comes to a good and charitable position and stands against the popular opinions in his milieu, more power to him. He should be encouraged, not mocked. And if you can show him a better way, he has shown himself open to a better way. Sneering and mocking won't make him fonder of your philosophy.</comment>

<comment>There are multiple forms of atheism; unlike you I can't speak for what "atheism believes."I don't adopt beliefs for which there is no evidence. I don't claim to know the truth, but I do have standards for those who do.  If you strongly believe in something extraordinary, the burden is on you for justifying it, especially if you intend to rely on your beliefs to set public policy that affects me.A sky-father who created the universe, sent plagues into Egypt, spoke through a burning bush, flooded the entire Earth, disposed of the water, impregnated a woman without sex, had a son with whom he is one and the same person, who then exorcised demons, fed 5000 with a basket of food, walked on water, healed leprosy, brought dead people back to life, died and rose from the dead, who now can be consumed by Catholics -- but not Protestants -- at communion, and involves himself in our daily lives is an extraordinary claim for which there is no more evidence than there is for Isis, Zeus, Thor, Shiva or Baal, none of whom, inexplicably, you believe in.This isn't sneering or mocking. It's pointing out the obvious.</comment>

<comment>You are sort of proving that you too can be silly</comment>

<comment>What part of the above do you find to be silly?</comment>

<comment>Atheism makes no such claim. Most of your comments have had merit, however, that statement was quite absurd.</comment>

<comment>Saying that someone needs something to tell them to be nice is dismissive in itself, referring to the Bible as a magical book was very clearly meant to devalue it. Also the "I guess" at the end was, what? Polite? I'm agnostic, I don't agree with religion at all, but I can still act like a decent human being. If you honestly don't think that comment was anything more than an insult, I really question your judgement. "Goes to the heart of the matter"? This article is about how there is room for progressive viewpoints in Christian religion. So, what matter, exactly, did it get to the heart of? The one that you replied with? At least your statement has a purpose and explains it; the other guy is simply being a jerk. Just because you agree, doesn't mean he isn't. Let's be real here.</comment>

<comment>The utter lack of evidence supporting the historicity or metaphysical claims of Christianity allows anyone to make of it what they will.  Christians have committed both horrific crimes and selfless deeds of altruism in the name of their faith.  The comment just put a fine point on the reality:  that people bring their morality with them, good or bad, and whether they are Christian or not is an independent variable.His comment was intended to be dismissive and I can't disagree.  The Bible is a book of mythology that underlies an elaborate superstition, and for many it would be the basis for a long list of terrible public policies if not for the Constitution.  We can't do enough to call its credibility into question so that rational decision making can rise to the top.  He just said it more economically than I.</comment>

<comment>Unfortunately, this is true--and sadly, often the horrific crimes were thought to be selfless deeds of altruism.There's been 2000 years of bloodshed by Christians against other Christians, against Jews, against Muslims, against Hindus, Jainists, Sikhs, and non-believers--all done in the name of God and to the glory of Jesus. The sword has been used to conquer and convert quite readily because it's "for Jesus."Yes, there have been phenomenal acts of selflessness as well. I believe in Jesus, and I believe he has inspired people to do more than they thought possible, to go the "extra mile," to forgive and heal and bless and release.And I've seen the same name of Jesus used as a reason to hate and exclude, to kill and beat, to mock and shame.Personally, I hope it's because the people using the name of Jesus so abusively are people who don't know him, because I want to believe that faith in Jesus will lead to changed lives, but there is strong evidence and many examples of the purest people having the basest motives and committing the cruelest acts.We who call ourselves followers of Christ and bearers of his image should, in my opinion, be a little more humble about the faith we claim can change worlds when it seems to appear to change so few individuals.</comment>

<comment>When we meet one that isn't, we'll find out.</comment>

<comment>I have a lot of family members who are atheists but are not jerks, but we do joke about flying spaghetti monster (I'm not an atheist)</comment>

<comment>I don't see how a believer can joke about the FSM unless you don't get the point of it.  It's literally the same as Christianity, as any religion. A wild claim existing without a shred of evidence which is asserted to be true on the premise of negative-proof.</comment>

<comment>Oh you poor person...the essence of life is to quit taking yourself so seriously.</comment>

<comment>What did he say precisely that to you makes him a jerk: that he called the Bible a "magical book"?That relying on a "magical book" to determine moral conduct is a bit silly?It seems to me that you calling him a jerk for expressing his opinion about the validity of Bible-based morality in fact makes you a jerk. </comment>

<comment>He tried to belittle the author, as you very well know. Being an atheist doesn't protect you from magical thinking, and a little generosity instead of that sneering "good on you I guess" would go a long way. You are pretty thick if you can't see that, which tells me you're probably an Entitled White Male, one of those people who feel free to insult other people and then apologize by saying they're sorry you chose to be offended.</comment>

<comment>Well, I agree he didn't express his opinion in the most tactful manner, but I think his point is that one shouldn't need a book of rules nor "fairy tales" to tell them how to be "good".People get a little snarky sometimes, but I don't think that that automatically makes one a "jerk" nor does it mean all atheists are jerks.I wonder, however, what makes you assume I am an "Entitled White Male", merely because I think calling someone a jerk is inappropriate. (I am indeed a white male, but how "entitled" I am is debatable.)If I offend someone intentionally, perhaps I am indeed acting like a jerk, but surely you agree that sometimes people are offended rather easily.</comment>

<comment>Yes.</comment>

<comment>What is the magical formula for you that makes you make "moral" decisions"?  There is some belief system that goes into that that cannot be purely rational.But.  I really am more interested in what people do, not their justifications for doing so.  Like everyone I know, I tend to judge people's behavior by what I think is right.  We all have to decide at some point who is the arbiter of what is right.</comment>

<comment>I don't believe I use any "magical formula", but I do have what I call a "First Principle"; namely, I believe happiness is preferable to suffering.However, it is not just MY happiness which is at issue; rather, it is the amount of happiness in the world. I may have to suffer in order for there to be more happiness in the world. Accepting that suffering would be a moral choice; not accepting that suffering would be immoral.To be clear, by suffering I do not (necessarily) mean great suffering, such as starvation or self-immolation. It may simply mean doing without something I desire.Happiness, too, can be pleasure, contentment or merely the absence of suffering.Thus when choosing to act, I must consider whether satisfying my desire would make the world a little happier or would increase suffering.Many times-- perhaps most of the time-- we cannot know with any certainty and, of course, many actions have no measurable effect on others. For example, should I drink water or juice? There is no possible way I could calculate whether that choice would create an increase in happiness or in suffering. These kind of choices are, as far as can be determined, amoral.Some choices I make may, in fact, tip the balance toward suffering. I know, for example, that by driving my car instead of bicycling, I am negatively effecting the environment and even possibly increasing the likelihood of war; yet I still drive.If I believe that the net effect of my choice to drive is to increase suffering, then that choice is immoral. I make no claim to sainthood; I am quite certain choices I have made have increased suffering in the world.Like anyone, I rationalize this by telling myself that my input is insignificant and, at any rate, I do much else to increase happiness. That is, as I said, a rationalization. I, too, am often selfish and weak.As to "what people do" as opposed to their justifications, I am perhaps more charitable. I do not buy the Protestant belief that "the road to hell is paved with good intentions".I think intentions are very important. Justification, however, has nothing to do with intention. Intention precedes a choice; justification comes after the fact. If my intention is to act morally, but I erred in my judgement and in fact increased suffering rather than happiness, I can hardly be blamed. No one can see the future. My choice was still morally correct, even if the result was negative.On the other hand, if I choose to act immorally, but the result actually increases happiness, my intention was still immoral. For example, if I choose to kill someone, not for any "grand purpose" but just because he cut me off on the road or because I wanted his sneakers, my intention is immoral; evil, if you will.If later I discover that he was en route to commit a mass murder, my choice is not retroactively justified. I cannot now claim I acted morally nor am I hero.You are correct that we all have to decide who is the "arbiter" of what is "right". I assert, however, that regardless of who we claim to be that arbiter, each of us is our own arbiter.I can say, "I won't do x, because the Bible says not to" but it is I that chooses to follow that biblical prohibition. Moreover, I interpret the Bible in my own unique way. Someone else may say that x is not in fact prohibited by the Bible. Same-sex marriage is a perfect example. Kim Davis believes that the Bible says she should not grant marriage licenses to gay couples. Others believe the Bible says they should.In reality, it is not the Bible nor God that is telling them which action is morally correct; it is their own minds. (Personally, I think Kim Davis should heed Jesus' words about rendering unto Caesar that which is Caesar's. But, again, that's just my interpretation.)I don't know how much of this "system" I subscribe to is rational, but I don't believe it's very "magical".</comment>

<comment>I don't think any "moral" system can be "rational" which I am using in the most reductionist way possible. Your essay is very compelling. There are many things I struggle with, the greatest one being my lack of knowledge and understanding.</comment>

<comment>Well, I agree that in a certain sense morality cannot be rational. Ultimately, morality is based on a visceral "feeling" about what is desirable and what is abhorrent.If, for example, one feels that pain is preferable to pleasure, then he may wish to increase pain in the world. Of course, the problem is that that muddies the meanings of "pain" and "pleasure"; what most people experience as pain, the sadomasochist experiences as pleasure. So by increasing pain, the sadomasochist is actually, in his mind, increasing pleasure.The problem, therefore, is that the sadomasochist is simply out of tune with the majority's experience of pain and pleasure. If he increases what he feels is "pleasure" in the world, he actually increases pain (or suffering). If, on the other hand, he recognizes that his concepts of pain and pleasure are at odds with others' experience, he can still act morally by denying himself "pleasure" so as to not cause others pain.Another kind of far out example is ritual cannibalism. In some cultures, traditionally, eating the flesh of dead ancestors was believed to be an act of honor and respect. It was believed that by eating the flesh of the dead, one allowed the spirit of the deceased to live on within the body of the living. Thus, cannibalism provided a kind of immortality.So, too, in some cultures it was considered an act of respect to eat the flesh of fallen warriors if that warrior fought valiantly. The belief was that his strength, courage and valor would be passed on to the one who eats his flesh.In both these cases, cannibalism would not be immoral. To refuse to honor your grandfather or your brave enemy by eating their flesh would be, in fact, to dishonor them and their friends and families may experience grief or existential angst by your refusal. Refusing to fulfill one's ritualistic duty would thus be immoral.My "First Principle" is where rationality ends. I can think of no "rational" argument as to why I believe "happiness" (or pleasure in the broadest sense) is preferable to suffering. It is a "visceral" feeling.So, in that, I believe you are correct that, in a strict, reductionist sense, morality cannot be completely rational.However, if one determines his or her own "First Principle" and then develops a moral system according to the rules of logic, that moral system is rational in a less strict sense.For example, if I believe all dogs can fly and I know Fido here is a dog, it would be logical for me to believe that Fido can fly. Throwing Fido off a cliff would neither be sadistic nor immoral, since he can fly.My logic is a consistent but obviously there is something wrong with my premise; namely, dogs can't fly.So, if one's morality is questionable then there are three possibilities:One, he is not logically consistent; he says he believes x, but he acts contrary to that belief. This may be nothing more than an intellectual failure. If one points out the inconsistency, he may alter his behavior.Two, he willfully acts contrary to his expressed belief. Thus he is a hypocrite and this is, to me, the epitome of immorality. The hypocrite is not inconsistent because of a failure of logic; he merely ignores his "First Principle" or, more likely, his expressed belief is not really what he believes.Three, one's "First Principle" is simply out of step with reality, like believing dogs can fly. In this case, the individual may be both logically consistent and not a hypocrite, but his actions still seem morally questionable.It is this third possibility where a philosophical discussion of morality has value. It is pointless to discuss morality with a hypocrite. Regardless of his agreement on a moral question, he will act morally or immorally on whim.But, if one indeed tries to be consistent, then it is worthwhile to examine that person's guiding principle. There, if you are in disagreement, it is possible to show how the person's "First Principle" is faulty. If he is indeed a rational person and your argument is convincing, he will alter his belief.Often the problem is that one's "First Principle" (and we all have one whether or not we recognize it) is not reduced sufficiently. For example, if I believe killing is immoral, then killing a person to stop them from committing a terrorist attack would be immoral.One may indeed believe ALL killing is immoral, but I think most people would agree there are exceptions. The principle that "killing is immoral" may need to be reduced further.At any rate, I think most immorality is due to either hypocrisy or logical inconsistency. I don't know if anything can be done about hypocrisy; the hypocrite is fundamentally an immoral person.But I think we can do much to teach people to: one, examine their own moral systems and to develop their own sufficiently reduced "First Principles" and two, to be logically consistent.Granted, there will always be hypocrites and people will not always be logical, but I think focussing on this kind of "moral education", rather than just following the words of what some ancient "prophet" said would be beneficial to society.And it is not just you that lacks knowledge and understanding (if I may state the obvious). The reason that "only God can judge" is because, supposedly, God is omniscient.Because an omniscient god would not lack "knowledge and understanding", he or she (or it) would be capable of infallible judgement.One problem I have with the idea of omniscience is that if God were to fully understand a sinner's motivation, he or she or it would not be able to condemn the sinner.If you or I could understand 100% why Ted Bundy or Adam Lanza committed their crimes, we would empathize completely. We would understand, for example, that the sodium ions in their brains were at increased levels at a particular moment, that dopamine in the synaptic cleft was not being sufficiently reuptaken, that they believed aliens or God were commanding them or any other of the infinite number of variables that effect behavior were the "reason" for the atrocity.So, since we all necessarily lack knowledge and understanding, all we can do is try humility and tolerance.</comment>

<comment>Yeah, they should be "respectable" amiright?</comment>

<comment>? Being kind and respectful never hurt anyone.</comment>

<comment>No. We certainly don't. I LOVE this article because it illustrates how we can all come together. The comment above is anathema to that.</comment>

<comment>I've not found anything in particular in atheism or in Christianity (or in any faith, really) that requires people to be jerks.People are who they are. Sometimes their religion changes them for the better, sometimes not.</comment>

<comment>Yes, some of us do need weekly reminders and daily reinforcement, in fact. I know I do. I fully respect people whose conscience leads them to conclude there is no higher power, or at least not one very involved with us. We must follow our conscience, after all. </comment>

<comment>The GOP isnt known as the American Taliban for no reason. They arent nice people and would  stone us all in a second if let off the leash. You should also be more specific about who you are mocking when you make fun of religion. I think white christians are the dumbest people on earth but I wouldnt call the Talmud, Koran, or Torah magic story books. We could actually learn a lot from those faiths.</comment>

<comment>A damned foolish statement, which is simply peddled by the paranoid , mentally unstable, or, combining both traits, a liberal.I see Texas is run top-down by GOP conservatives.How many suicide bombers have they dispatched to the heathenish San Francisco?None you say?Well then, WTF are you peddling then ideologue?</comment>

<comment>The only domestic political issue to inspire bombing and assassination on a regular basis is opposition to abortion rights.  (Although isolated nuts like Dylann Roof, Elliot Rodger and Ismaaiyl Abdullah Brinsley may have had political motives.</comment>

<comment>Sure buddy sure, the folks calling them the "American Taliban" are the same Leftist that tell everyone there is nothing to fear from Islam.As if the whole insult does not depend on the actual Taliban's overtly Islamic religious motivations.Plus you do know the Koran is based on the Bible? Which in turn is based upon Jewish practices and books.</comment>

<comment>If you've studied history, you'd know that humanity has an incredibly poor track record of treating people who are in any way different from them like decent human beings.  We still suck at empathy, but we were even worse at it 2000 years ago.  There's no point in belittling someone who wants or needs assistance with not being a monster, because not being a monster is hard, especially if someone doesn't have the social  infrastructure to be able to think in an abstract manner about these things.  Truth be told, we aren't even a civilized species yet.</comment>

<comment>Indeed, on the chain of evolution we are still quite an uncivilized species!</comment>

<comment>There's a "chain of evolution"? So evolution has some destination it is moving toward?</comment>

<comment>I don't entirely disagree with you, but the tone of your comment doesn't strike me as a great demonstration of how easy it is to show compassion and empathy.Some people do find it easy to be compassionate without reinforcement from an outside source. Others do not. Those with a more emotionally reactive temperament often require reminders to curb their fear and anger, and some derive those reminders from religious texts. If that works for them, that's great; I don't see any reason to insult this practice.</comment>

<comment>Christianity consists of much, much more than morality.</comment>

<comment>Such as......?</comment>

<comment>Such as redemption and forgiveness through the sacrifice of Jesus Christ. Following moral laws will not justify anyone.</comment>

<comment>"Redemption and forgiveness of sins...."That IS morality, or at least it is a part of moral theology."Sin" means immoral conduct. Without sin, there would be no need for redeption nor forgiveness (nor sacrifice, for that matter).So following "moral laws" is indeed imperative.It would make no sense to say, for instance, "I can do whatever I want; I don't have to follow 'moral laws' because Jesus/God will just forgive me later and I will be redeemed."</comment>

<comment>I'm just saying it has a greater message then a recommendation for how people should act.</comment>

<comment>Wow, Brady, apparently you need a magical book too. Way to completely miss the point. I'm agnostic, but I can still respect others. I especially respect this writer, that recognizes that many in her faith don't "practice what they preach".</comment>

<comment>I would agree with you sentiments here, but I you could probably be a little less snarky.  i am Jewish.  Needless to say I have never read either the old or new testament.  I take most of the stuff in both as fables or morality tales.  After all how could any body believe that some one lived 900 years, or that it rained for 40 days and nights or a big fish swallowed some one.  Or that the earth is only 6000 years old. Only the most fundamentalist person could believe those things. I am guessing that there are things in the Torah that would follow some of the same teachings as Jesus, although Jesus was never mentioned in the old testament.  This is a long way of saying we should be smart enough to do the right thing with out having some book tell us what to do.</comment>

<comment>Your comment might suggest that you do?  You're not seeming all that nice without one (presumably).</comment>

<comment>Oh, you are not alone! First off, if you read the comments, please disregard ones from people who use the anonymity to say things they'd never say to a neighbor's face! I doubt they even mean it.Religious conservatives who happen to be somewhat liberal politically are a minority. We don't really have a political home. In Europe we might be Christian Democrats. We may personally be pro-life, but willing to live with restrictions rather than a ban. Or we may conclude that scriptural prohibitions pertain to temple prostitution, in the same category as the prohibitions against eating food sacrificed in temples- not much of an issue in the present day. We may accept the advantages of capitalism over other systems, but we criticize its impacts on those human beings unable to shift for themselves.Stay true to your convictions, but above all, remember to do justly, love mercy, and walk humbly. (Micah 6:8)</comment>

<comment>Most European Christian Democrats are actually atheist. The christian part of that title is more a historical relic then descriptive of the people who make up those parties. The fact of the matter is christianity has no place at all in politics.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>I don't have any sources, but having done research on religious demographics in England a while ago, I can confirm that this is the case (at least in England itself). People are generally "Christian" in name only and only go to church once or twice a year. There are very few devout Christians there.</comment>

<comment>But more devout Islamics.Tell us how well thats all going.........................</comment>

<comment>Super-nature abhors a vacuum?</comment>

<comment>But likes genocide, war refugee movement, and the slaughter of women and religious minorities.Glad you could clear that up for us liberal...............</comment>

<comment>When are you religious fanatics going to realize that you're just as bad as the Taliban in Afghanistan. Practice your religion privately. Don't even think about shoving your beliefs on anyone else. Practice what you have learned - if anything.</comment>

<comment>I'm going to assume, based on your use of the word "fanatic", that anyone who suggests a religious tincture in any discussion is thus a fanatic.What's unique, is that by offering this anti-religious biasness, you put your argument within the realm of fanaticism.  So, we now have a far left and a far right with both looking for middle ground.  Politics at it's finest.</comment>

<comment>The term is "Muslims", but from your posting history here, I can tell that you're not that bright to begin with, so I'll excuse you on that one.</comment>

<comment>Why would I even require it from your ilk liberal?</comment>

<comment>What is an ilk liberal, oh Grand Clown? Does ReapersHarvest possess one? And if so, where can they be purchased?</comment>

<comment>What's a peanut gallerist? C'est toi. Piss le eff off. </comment>

<comment>since when does going to church define your faith. My mother got her master's in divinity. She lives her faith everyday, but we don't go to an organized church. That's because she hasn't found one she likes yet.</comment>

<comment>I don't think a majority are clear atheists, but a majority are not practicing believers, or at most only return to the practices for weddings, christenings, and funerals.</comment>

<comment>Baptisms. Not christenings. </comment>

<comment>Unlike the vast majority of Americans, Europeans are not fanatically religious. Religion does not occupy their life. They treat the religious side of their lives privately.</comment>

<comment>I think you may find G. K. Chesterton's description of a "patriot" of better use than atheist or agnostic.  The 2 latter terms suggest knowledgeable choice.</comment>

<comment>2nd reply - if religion or as you say, Christianity, has no place in the political system, where does the worldwide view for social justice fit in.  Wouldn't you liken the different political agendas in the Crimea to forms of social justice, albiet: injustice.</comment>

<comment>You don't need religion to want social justice. In fact, most regions-yes, including Christianity- enshrine bigotry as part of their faith, and are enemies of social justice.</comment>

<comment>Let's take G. K. Chesterton's term "patriot" and use it in Iraqi situation.  Chesterton's comment deals with Great Britain and its populace being 2 things: English and Anglican (mostly).  But why?  He said, if you asked the average person, they'd mostlikely give you a weird look and say "because...!"  They neither practice nor participate...they just plod along because that's what they do (patriot).  You will find about 25/30 % of all people within a system are truly active members.  The rest are patriots.So, the bigotry aspect doesn't really kick in except for a select few who have the ability to cause the 70% patriots to riot.  Riots are like family loyalty issues with large patriot party goes fueled with rumor.  If you questioned 500 ISIS members why they do what they do, it's an old answer to an old question.  They were doing the same thing 1600 years ago as were Christians pushing back.But the question remains about religious bigotry.  I would agree with you if I thought these people, born under a specific system and raised to the point of being a convinced and practicing religious group, were something else other than patriots.  However, my bet is on mob violence.</comment>

<comment>IronMike, you seem to want the best for your country, but I'm having difficultly following your argument.The big question I have for you, and others like you, is: How do you defined yourself? Are you an American that believes in the Christian faith? Or are you a Christian that happens to live in America?</comment>

<comment>I am US citizen and Catholic by birth, raised Catholic, served in Vietnam as US Marine (67-68), left the Faith of my childhood but returned and am now a convinced Catholic Christian adult still living in the US.</comment>

<comment>Thanks for the response, and a big thanks for your service to our country. I'm Catholic, spent 27 years overseas, and am too glad to be home.</comment>

<comment>2nd reply - to be a Convinced, Practicing Catholic has nothing to do with nationality.As a matter of info, and based on what we now know of the US involvement in Vietnam, I also lost my childlike loyalty to my country.  And, like my Faith, I am happy to report I've recovered but have learned there is no honor in war only brave men who honor their oath.</comment>

<comment>So you define yourself by your faith. The beauty is choice and the freedom to exercise it. Fortunately, as per our Founding Fathers, faith has no place in US politics or the government. Easy to say. Most find it impossible to practice.</comment>

<comment>Interesting, I find Obama ' s initial comments about our country quite true: we are no longer a Christian nation.  The Church has been calling this the post - Christian era and one of the reason why re-evangilization is so desparately needed.No religion in politics, hum?  How does one keep religion out of politics unless one is an atheist or agnostic.  I realize one can, by chance, be a good man but he didn't get that way on his own.  Whether you will admit it or not, the simple fact is that we can make no rational working decision without the help of God.  We blunder terrible when we prideful give ourselves that Big Attaboy.Whether Jew, Moslem, Christian, Atheist, whatever, politics is God's work among men.  We loose sight of that so quickly.</comment>

<comment>I'm glad we're not a Christian nation. I'm glad we're a secular nation. That way Christianity can be lived by the Christians and not forced on people who are not followers.</comment>

<comment>Religion has no place in any of the 3 branches of our government. We are a diverse nation of 350 million, and our government is for everyone.</comment>

<comment>One time I was asked the question, "what is the difference between morally right and contractually right?"Essentially, there are only 2 types of people: the living & the dead.  How many of the living have no religion.  Very few?  How many who have religious tenets use them when making choices: knowledge of good and bad - all of them.  They may not ascend to that idea but the basic character (face) of civilization is religion.I think our Forefathers envisioned Religion in Politics much like what history tells us of England and the various controls used in Europe where the corrupt use of religion was used to sway political favor.</comment>

<comment>Most of us derive our politics from our morality. If your morality is derived from your religious faith, then you can't check it at the door. In this particular young man's case, his religious convictions lead him to support candidates who care about social justice, or what the gospel of Matthew called, "the least of these." If you get there another way, good for you, but he's entitled to come to his own conclusions via his faith. What ought to have "no place," is the ability to impose one's creedal beliefs on another. And he's not asking for that.Also, he may very well know that the Christian Democrats are, of late, a secular phenomenon. He was talking about the fact that he agrees with their policies.</comment>

<comment>Toolbag.</comment>

<comment>So you're an Episcopalian. I'm cool w that. </comment>

<comment>It is welcoming to see Sanders being invited to speak there. I hope it's not to throw him to the wolves and burn him at the stake. Regardless, if his message is voiced with conviction and sincerity, he may spurn the debate within the conservative mind over exactly what type of America are we asking for? I don't see Sanders' vision for America as 100% socialism. In fact, I see Sanders' push for financial reform and regulation just as I saw TR's tackle of the monopolies as a way of eliminating concentrated greed and exacting a mechanism for allowing smaller businesses to blossom. I would welcome to break up of nearly all of these financial institutions and other major corporations (mainly in the Media market).</comment>

<comment>"It is welcoming to see Sanders being invited to speak there. I hope it's not to throw him to the wolves and burn him at the stake."I feel confident Bernie Sanders will have his chance to speak to a politely attentive audience. Unlike the reception that conservative speakers -- like Condi Rice for example -- receive at liberal universities, where they often get disinvited for "security reasons" -- or shouted down if they do try to speak.https://www.thefire.org/list-o...</comment>

<comment>Poor victim.</comment>

<comment>Rice's credibility was damaged because she openly supported the Iraq War when it was clear the administration had no strategy. Other than that, her life story is a testament to the American Dream (whatever that is). I don't think she deserves to be shouted at. Then again, liberal universities are so backwards PC these days, who cares what they shout at.</comment>

<comment>And Ayaan Hirsi Ali, what's your excuse for disinviting her?</comment>

<comment>You act as if I have say or control in who they schedule there?</comment>

<comment>People are a-holes sometimes. Especially the ones who simply memorize thier talking points and gallavant about the interwebs like a good little conservatroll.</comment>

<comment>I'm glad Sanders will be speaking at Liberty University. I haven't made up my mind about him yet, and I will likely withhold any decision until much later in 2016.With that said, it's a good thing to be exposed to people who say things we don't think about and who ask questions we have a hard time answering. A good college encourages students to stop being children merely accepting information and to start being adults discovering wisdom.</comment>

<comment>Then this makes most universities bad ones, given their own track records in this dept.This one has the guts that the liberal and leftwing-run ones do not.It invites one whose beliefs are in diametric opposition to their own.What does this say about the others whose ideological purity is to be maintained?And more importantly, what does this do to those under their tutelage..?http://www.theblaze.com/storie...those who forget the past, eh liberal....................?</comment>

<comment>The Blaze is a wonderful place for children, eh Tea Dolt?</comment>

<comment>Not the ''Blaze'' moron.But the video they carried which they did not produce................Tell me liberal, with such a lightning -fast response, did you speed-frame the thing?Or did you simply NOT watch it?Mebbe you should think,before shooting your mouth off.</comment>

<comment>Your spittle-flecked rage is deeply moving.Jesus loves you! Kissy-kissy.</comment>

<comment>Deflection noted.</comment>

<comment>Desperation noted.</comment>

<comment>It would be easier to take you seriously, in any way, shape or form, if you could conceal, even if only a little, the stench from your conservaturdism. Cheers.</comment>

<comment>Interesting piece. It must be lonely where you are. Have you gotten to the point of questioning your religious background and critically thinking through your faith? Just wondering. Btw. You also might want to review the difference between "than" and "then".</comment>

<comment>Christians historically have used their faith to support progressive programs, from the New Deal, to Civil Rights, to My Brother's Keeper. Conservatism and Christianity are recent bedfellows. Soon this student will discover that he is far from alone.</comment>

<comment>I'm an unbeliever and find representation of devout Christians in media generally terrifying. Kim Davis and prez candidates with their arms raised and whatnot. Encouraging to see that Jesus can make one a humanist.</comment>

<comment>Kim Davis is only receiving attention because she is a highly controversial person. Pope Francis is a much more genuine Christian figure who is often highlighted in the media.</comment>

<comment>Fair point about Francis. His demonstrative humility (if that's the right word) and comparatively inclusive speech is an outlier, and encouraging indeed.</comment>

<comment>Well, the Nazarene was a communalist hippy. He is the original "Bleeding Heart", after all.</comment>

<comment>How funny. The raised hands always scares me, too. Seeing them do it front of a courthouse is even worse. It seems as if they are doing it in a threatening manner - trying to take up as much space as possible. Like a puffer fish.</comment>

<comment>I'm personally interested in your term "unbeliever".  Just struck me odd.  I usually see "nonbeliever".  I'd like to communicate but not this forum.  If you'd like to comm, I can be found on Messenger (Mike Ervin) or cmervin1@gmail.com </comment>

<comment>Many people try to incorporate their faiths throughout many aspects of their lives, at least superficially. Because of this, and the breadth of interpretation of religious texts, people use their faith to support or justify all sorts of things be they great or terrible.</comment>

<comment>Check out the Christian Left on twitter.</comment>

<comment>I think a problem arose when the Christians figured out that for Progressives, God is not God; the State is God.</comment>

<comment>Progressive Programs - I sense what you mean by this term and the way you attach both Conservatism and Christianity to the term is that these "programs" are new, as in: never been used before.Taking into account that the USA is a relativity young nation, actually not completely formed as 50 states until the 1960s, there has been certain required needs to support the poor.  I am not speaking of governmental policy here but am talking about the Church's call to provide a human being's 5 basic requirements: food, clothing, housing, healthcare, job.  These are sometime referred to as the rights of life.If this is what you refer to as progressive programs, we're on the same page.  If you're referring to man's ability to create havoc within programs, I don't have an answer to that issue.  Man does what man does.</comment>

<comment>Count me surprised he hasn't long since been expelled from Liberty for espousing such views</comment>

<comment>She won't be able to start a Bernie Sanders for President club since Sanders supports abortion.  Liberty University forbids clubs supporting political candidates who support abortion.</comment>

<comment>He might not support abortion, but he supports the right for people to decide themselves. I think that is the right Stance in a country that does not have a state religion.</comment>

<comment>There is quite a difference between supporting abortion and supporting abortion rights.  For government to determine who does or does not get an abortion is profoundly authoritarian, whether that government is that of the Peoples' Republic of China or that of an American state.A question for opponents of abortion rights:If your young adult daughter, sister or close friend were facing an unwanted pregnancy and came to you for advice because she values your input, would you tell her, "I am not competent to advise you, and you are not qualified to decide whether to abort or carry the pregnancy to term.  Go ask the governor, and do whatever he tells you to do"?Why would anyone want doofuses/paragons of sexual morality like Elliot Splits-her, Mark Sanford or Arnold Schwarzenegger making abortion decisions for citizens?</comment>

<comment>I had assumed the author was female, as the words seemed to convey at least an ounce of compassion, far more than would be typically found in a white "christian" male at Mr. Falwell's training kampf.</comment>

<comment>Next to be debated: How many angels can dance on the head of a pin?</comment>

<comment>Please. Show some respect; this is a serious discussion.</comment>

<comment>That was indeed a serious comment, on the author's fundamental assumptions, expressed as lampoon. </comment>

<comment>From a scientific stand point it most certainly was a serious comment.   "If you can't explain it simply, you don't understand it well enough"...Einstein.</comment>

<comment>Zero. Because there are no angels.Or perhaps an infinite number, since every dimensionless particle in the universe is in fact an angel. </comment>

<comment>The kind of capitalism we've seen lately is making some well-applied socialism look pretty good to a lot of Americans.  More every day, in fact.  This is a good thing.</comment>

<comment>Sanders really isn't using socialist rhetoric beyond references to himself as a socialist. Socialist politicians tend to advocate building relationships with unions and are generally more active in the labor movement. Sanders is more of a traditional American progressive advocating for the expansion of social programs and the social safety net along with political and corporate reform.</comment>

<comment>A socialist would also support government ownership of at least those companies that are of strategical importance. Sanders does not even go that far, although the conservative trolls surely claim otherwise. A great comparison is to Compare the policy Ideas of Corbyn vs Sanders.</comment>

<comment>"Bashing immigrants is a poor political strategy, but it also represents a moral failure. As a Christian, I'm compelled to see and talk about each immigrant as a person made in the image of God, with inherent dignity. The Hebrew scriptures are replete with commands from God to his people to love, defend, and seek justice for the 'foreigner who resides among you.' In the New Testament, followers of Jesus are commanded to practice philoxenia  in English, hospitality  which literally means the love of strangers. How we welcome a stranger, Jesus says, is how we welcome him."-- Rev. Rich Nathan, senior pastor of Vineyard Columbus, a church of 8,000 attendees in central Ohio (from Cleveland.com, this morning)</comment>

<comment>The Donald and his rabid followers aint gonna like that at all!</comment>

<comment>The ease with which (most) political christian conservatives in America dismiss scripture that conflicts with their personal prejudices rises to the level of absurdity.</comment>

<comment>Good on you, buddy.  I'm first and foremost a pragmatist; I think that all of my beliefs should make me a better person, otherwise they're just ornamental drag (or worse).  Yours are the very best kind of beliefs that can be labeled Christian.  I just wish they were more common.</comment>

<comment>I'm an agnostic, but was raised Christian. The Bible itself, definitely encourages compassion, empathy, and assisting the less fortunate, and I too was taught that a thirsty/hungry/tired person coming to your for help, should be treated just as you would Jesus himself, because it could be, and in a sense is. It is not Christianity that is a problem (to the hateful atheists) it's the organizations within the religion, and priests and pastors that take advantage of parishioners, and skew messages in the Bible for monetary and political reasons. Not all, I have met a lot of awesome priests and pastors, but there are definitely lots out there, that I feel take advantage. Pope Francis is a great man, but still people block out the messages he tries to send, that don't mesh with their politics.</comment>

<comment> This is spot on. I'm not Roman Catholic -- raised "Christian-ish" and became Christian later on -- and while I don't agree with some of the theological conclusions of the Roman Catholic church, I think this is true of everyone, that we listen to what we agree to and tune out what we don't. When the current Pope speaks about leaving gay people alone, or offering extraordinary reconciliation to women who've had abortions, or says that humans are worth more than money, he says things some like and others do not like.It's far more likely that political views determine religious views and values than the opposite. Few people are thoroughly Christian; i.e., Christ-like, and it's far more likely you can tell their political views by the brand of Christianity they embrace than their actual faithfulness to the ways of Christ.It is not at all likely I'd ever become Roman Catholic, but this pope would tempt me to do so.</comment>

<comment>It's power dynamics. We are prone to them as human beings, heck, as animals, really. Religion is an unbeatable power trip once you start claiming to speak for God. It's not just priests/preachers/imams either. It's ordinary believers lording it over each other, and especially over outsiders. That this was not the original intent should go without saying.</comment>

<comment>I don't care whatever you believe, keep it to yourself, there is absolutely zero tolerance in any relationship between politics and superstitions. You don't see a Voodoo in politics, you don't see religionism in politics.</comment>

<comment>Isn't life strange. I went to parochial school for eight years which gave us thinking skills that undermined most of the catechism we were taught. At least some of us. One grew up to own and edit a conservative rag only good for bullies and bird cages.</comment>

<comment>me too, not 8 but 3... I feel like those of us that actually studied the bible, couldn't possibly align with the GOP.</comment>

<comment>Did you go to a Jesuit school? They are usually pretty good at teaching critical thinking skills.</comment>

<comment>Not sure of affiliation, it was elementary school taught by nuns when they used to wear big kites on their heads. It probably gave us a head start in some ways and retarded us in others.</comment>

<comment>I went to a Catholic school with the "kite heads" too -  I believe they were from the Dominican order. Strangely enough, about halfway through my time there (eight years), they "went liberal" and ditched the kites.</comment>

<comment>Bernie Sanders constantly emphasizes that the political revolution is about bringing people together. Like Jesus, he recognizes the common humanity of ALL people. For believers, it means that we are all God's children. This is why Bernie is going to LU. He has a deep faith in the fundamental humanity of everyone. You will notice, that he never has a bad word for anyone, except to condemn the "greed" of the very wealthy. He constantly emphasizes the importance of throwing the money changers out of the temple of our politics.</comment>

<comment>This comment was deleted.</comment>

<comment>It doesnt take much imagination to figure it out. I suppose that words like "blasphemer", "anti-christ" and "communist" are freely tossed about.</comment>

<comment>You want to see how well politics and religion can be mixed? Look at Iran, Pakistan, Afghanistan, Iraq and Syria. Politics and religion are the same thing in that region. Maybe the U.S. can aspire to be more like Iraq?</comment>

<comment>Maybe you can aspire to write more relevant comments.</comment>

<comment>No more trolling. And I mean that in a larger sense. I'm not religious, but I'm sick and tired of feeling so separated from my Christian brothers and sisters in this country. Any candidate that seeks to actively unite our citizenry again after decades of demagoguery and political childishness has my vote. There will be issues we don't agree on, but I have faith that we have much more in common than not.</comment>

<comment>Where I am from you keep your beliefs to yourself. Your beliefs govern how you treat people, but don't go blabbing about it all the time. Works pretty well for us up here in New England, the real America.</comment>

<comment>Kind of a don't-ask-don't-tell for beliefs?</comment>

<comment>More along the lines of "Your beliefs are yours, my beliefs are mine. Show you are a good person, don't tell me."</comment>

<comment>For many, being a good person involves a relationship with God and an effort to encourage and support others to do the same.  Preaching (whatever beliefs) is one thing, living a life of example is another, and being a good person involves both.I don't mean to put words into your mouth, and I'm asking sincerely. What are your thoughts on people that talk about their significant others? Is it: "Don't tell me about this great person in your life. You have your people and I have mine. I don't care about your loved ones."?</comment>

<comment>Well for many, those people are very irritating on general principle.  Imagine you were just at work and someone tried to hard sell you a used car.  It's difficult to get people to buy something they weren't shopping for, and it's very arrogant to assume that you know the true answer to an unanswerable question.   To your second point, context matters. Is this a stranger? Is this someone at work I have to think for 30 seconds to remember their name?  If it's not someone I know it would be very weird.  Your analogy also doesn't fit, unless they are trying to pull you in for a threesome. As you alluded to in your first paragraph, if someone is talking to you about their religious beliefs they are usually trying to get you involved.  But obviously I'm fine with people having whatever beliefs they want as long as no one gets hurt.  Some people are naturally nice, some people (like me) have to work hard to be nice, some people need to promise of an eternal reward. Whatever make you act nice is ok with me.</comment>

<comment>Lol is this an attempt at snark?</comment>

<comment>Nope.</comment>

<comment>Sad</comment>

<comment>What's sad is all the Johnny-come-lately states in the middle that claim to be Real 'Murica.  Sure, and Gary Cherone is the real singer of Van Halen. And Godfather part III is the TRUE story.</comment>

<comment>Ok, now I KNOW you're joking.</comment>

<comment>https://www.youtube.com/watch?...</comment>

<comment>Is the Democratic student club at Liberty still outlawed? http://www.cbsnews.com/news/li...</comment>

<comment>Yes, because the Democratic Party supports abortion.  Any club that involves the promotion of abortion is forbidden since Liberty is a Christian university.</comment>

<comment>The right-wing leaders who decided to make abortion the issue-of-issues back in 1974 must be thrilled that a massive swath of America remains one-issue voters over 40 years later. Pro-life Republicans can literally do anything (hand the food supply over to Monsanto, torture people, shut down government, run up deficits, start dubious wars, ignore injured vets) and it doesn't matter to a hell of a lot of people. Only one issue matters.</comment>

<comment>Yeah, this is true.The so-called "pro-life" movement isn't pro-life. It has no provisions for the children or the mothers. It doesn't even want to fund health care for pregnant mothers. All it wants, it seems, is to prevent any kind of abortion, and if millions of women lose access to health care, then, hey, it's all good.</comment>

<comment>Liberty is a right-wing finishing school. Its founder would not tolerate anything that was not part of the Republican Party platform.</comment>

<comment>It would allow a club supporting Bernie Sanders if he were a pro-life Democrat.</comment>

<comment>No it wouldnt. Sanders is a life-long left-winger, which is clearly demonstrated in all of his policy ideas - not just his pro-choice stand. The despicable Jerry Falwell would have hated him with a passion, and the "universitys" administrative board surely feels the same way.</comment>

<comment>They weren't outlawed per se, they just don't receive official recognition from the university because the university doesn't want to "lend its name" and money to anything "contrary to its mission". They specifically cited the 2008 Democratic Party Platform's support for abortion and same sex marriage as the reasons why official recognition status was denied to the campus group (despite the fact the students themselves were pro-life and 'traditional' marriage).Liberty didn't apply the same scrutiny to the GOP's platform, which failed to address poverty as a key issue. Go figure.</comment>

<comment>The Bible is a story of genocide, racism, polygamy, slavery, murder and mutilation. Full of internal contradictions and ahistorical mythology, it nevertheless serves as an authoritative basis for many wacky and horrible public policies.Believers cherry-pick verses to support their pre-existing beliefs.  I take no comfort in nice people explaining themselves in terms of religion while the Catholic Church discourages the use of condoms in AIDS-ravaged Africa, American Evangelicals on "missions" advocate jailing gays and Christian presidential candidates undermine our Democracy by calling Supreme Court decisions "illegal."I have no doubt that our world would be a much better place if the Bible had never been written.</comment>

<comment>Bernie Sanders supports abortion on demand, Planned Parenthood, same-sex marriage, and legislation that is hostile to religious liberty. There is no way that any Christian could, in good conscience, support a Bernie Sanders candidacy.  Also, Jesus stressed that it was the job of the Christian community to help the poor, not the government so the sole reason the author gives to support Sanders is not based on Christian teachings.</comment>

<comment>Jesus didn't say anything about the government's role in same sex marriage or abortion, either (edit: but I doubt you'd say candidates should ignore Christian teachings on the matter).</comment>

<comment>He also didn't speak about killing our enemies, either. But go figure--we do a lot of things Jesus told us not to, and then claim we're only following Christ.</comment>

<comment>Ultimately, it's up to Christians to interpret the teachings of Jesus and define what Christianity is, not the atheists or agnostics who make up the majority of posters here. Thus, abortion and homosexuality are sins.</comment>

<comment>Book, chapter and verse wherein Jesus' teachings on abortion are recorded?Same question as to His teachings on homosexuality?</comment>

<comment>"No True Scotsman"You should look it up.</comment>

<comment>Except this Christian has decided that the faith will survive with homosexuals onboard. Not all branches of the faith, but some. And in a thousand years, when sexual morality or mortality or genetics has made some crazy shift on par with the huge shift in sexual ethics between first century Greece and today? Christianity will keep going through that too.</comment>

<comment>"It is up to Christians to interpret the teachings of Jesus.."Hmm...so those who are not Christian are not bound by God's Law? So Jesus was only speaking to Christians (who of course did not yet exist as Christians)?I thought Jesus' mission was for the Jews and Gentiles alike; in other words, for all of humanity.Isn't it the duty of the evangelist to speak to the unbelievers? You seem to believe "Christians" are some secret society, a club to which only the privileged are allowed entry.You have just denied the universality of Jesus' ministry.At any rate, I have never met two Christians who agree on every single issue and I've discussed religion with A LOT of Christians. There are millions of Christians who disagree with you on both abortion and homosexuality, so do they share the responsibility of "defining Christianity" or do you just exclude them from your club?Did God grant you the authority to decide who is Christian and who is not?</comment>

<comment>The way I see it, Jesus was pretty interesting in healing, so he would have supported a low-cost health clinic like PP, which provides a variety of excellent services. He taught about compassion and love, so I think he would have supported the union of two people who loved one another, regardless of gender. He said nothing about abortion, so it's impossible to determine the Christian perspective on this issue. My sense is that since more people die when abortion is illegal (women frequently die from botched illegal abortions), he would have supported choice in this matter.I'm also a little confused about why you're upset that a candidate would not support your interpretation of your religious beliefs, but then also upset at the idea that his legislation would support your religious beliefs by helping those in need. Do you want politics and faith to be separate or not?</comment>

<comment>Amazing how Jesus agrees with you on every topic not mentioned in the Gospels.</comment>

<comment>"Religious liberty" as espoused by lunatic theocrats like Kentucky Kim?</comment>

<comment>The government" back in the days of Jesus was not democratic, it was militaristic. The idea of government providing social services was unknown, and developed much later in Europe.To use the Bible as an excuse for opposing government programs to help poor people is beneath contempt really. You are simply imposing your own bias here and attributing it to God.</comment>

<comment>It's very odd indeed to proclaim you want a candidate who upholds Christian values when it comes to abortion but not feeding the poor, especially considering the Bible has a lot more to say about latter than the former.</comment>

<comment>Exactly. Leviticus rules, while the Sermon on the Mount takes a back seat. I've never understood that.</comment>

<comment>Which is weird, because Leviticus is for them, back then. The Sermon on the Mount is for us, his followers.Rules are much easier to memorize, I guess. To be someone who follows Christ would require some changes that might cause discomfort.</comment>

<comment>People don't need sharply delineated limits to show them how to be good. No; they want them so they know exactly how much mischief they can get away with, without stepping over the line.</comment>

<comment>Oh, interesting point!Reminds me of something a pastor said years ago, how we want to know just how close we can get to the line that separates sinners from the saved in order to have as much fun as we can with the sinners while remaining the saved. Going to hell but turning back to heaven when it counts, as it were.</comment>

<comment>That's because abortion and homosexuality were strictly forbidden in Judea so Jesus didn't preach against it like he did against adultery and greed which was common in that time. Paul saw homosexuality practiced in Rome and threw it in with the rest of the sins.  It is thus a sin if you're a Christian.</comment>

<comment>Nope. Jesus believed that government involvement in helping the poor would keep poor people forever dependent on government. That is not the goal of Christianity. See teach a man to fish.</comment>

<comment>So, youre saying that Rush Limbaugh is Jesus? Or are you just projecting your own ideology on old J.C.?</comment>

<comment>In the modern world, it is government that is tasked with teaching a man, and woman these days, to fish. Its called public education.  And since "fishing" includes high math and science, it takes a lot of resources.Did Jesus have anything to say about Social Security or Medicare?</comment>

<comment>And yet, helping the poor is a most important Christian duty and is talked about at length throughout Scripture. That cannot be waved away by a few random passages that have been distorted for narrow political purposes.</comment>

<comment>Teach a man to fish is not actually in scripture.</comment>

<comment>Jesus did not say a shit about that. In his time there was no such concept.</comment>

<comment>Book, chapter and verse as to the beliefs you attribute to Jesus?</comment>

<comment>"No True Scotsman"You should look it up.</comment>

<comment>In many schools of Jewish tradition, life didn't begin at conception but at "quickening." This word literally means coming alive, because when the word was coined a few centuries ago, this was a common belief in Europe as well. The Protestant churches largely retained this understanding, it is only recently that Evangelic churches joined the Catholic church in opposing all abortions. You can certainly argue that modern science shows that life begins at conception, and that this imposes moral obligations on us, but don't assume it was a common belief of Jewish rabbis in the first century.</comment>

<comment>I believe life begins at forty.</comment>

<comment>Way to make the teachings and practices of charity and humility of Jesus, about neither of those things."If you want to be perfect, go and sell all your possessions and give the money to the poor, and you will have treasure in heaven. Then come, follow me."No one actually believes to Jesus's message, they just want to live how they believe is right and twist the Bible around it. </comment>

<comment>In what book, chapter and verse of scripture did the recorded words of Jesus address any of those political topics?  Do you really think it mattered to Jesus who improves the lot of the poor?The most complete description of the Day of Judgment in the Bible is recorded in the 25th chapter of the Gospel of Matthew.  I find it significant that no one asks questions about politics in that description.</comment>

<comment>You upvoted your own comment?  Lol.And there is nothing in the Bible about abortion and same sex marriage.</comment>

<comment>Christians have been divided into republican Christians and then Christians that agree with the Pope Francis style of faith.  There's nothing to be said to convince a faithful person of anything than what they have faith in.The perception of them by others than has more aspect of changing opinion. One sect certainly looks more humble and caring than the other. </comment>

<comment>Good for you for being able to break out of the box your community was trying to seal you up in, and good for the university and Bernie Sanders for agreeing to his giving a talk there.I'm not a Christian, but I've always wondered why conservative Christians seem so much more focused on the vengeful,jealous God of the old Testament as opposed to the loving, forgiving, look out for the least of us God displayed in the New Testament. Sounds like you wondered the same thing.</comment>

<comment>I don't know why some Christians (not all, and not over all time) are so enamored of the vengeful God of the Old Testament and so dismissive of the grace and forgiveness of Jesus. On the cross he asked for God to forgive his tormentors and killers. That's quite a high bar as an example.I suspect that some people (who go on to become religious-Christian) find there is a need for order in their lives, which they find through obedience and sacrifice, and then, since they lose out on all the fun, find the need to ask God to smite the sinners who seem to be enjoying life more than they themselves do.I suppose some people are convinced through threats of a vengeful God, but it seems to me that when Jesus is recorded as speaking to sinners he was quite encouraging and accepting. I can't imagine, for example, him yelling at the woman at the well or Nicodemus. He seemed to reserve his ire for the people who claimed righteousness without holiness while demanding others follow the religious laws they themselves could not keep.</comment>

<comment>You are probably right. I suspect that psychology plays into it. People with a need for black and white clarity are drawn to more black and white interpretations, not just of Christianity, but Islam and ideologies ranging from communism to white supremacy. The problem with those interpretations is, in distinguishing so sharply between dark and light, they present their adherents as being totally in the light, and their opponents as wholly in the dark. This ignores the fact that the division between evil and good is a fissure that runs through each of our hearts. There are traditions in all the Abrahamic faiths that embrace this truth. Keep seeking, you'll find your way.</comment>

<comment>They're creating God in their own image, so no wonder that God is not a nice guy. :-(</comment>

<comment>Class of 91 LU alum here, one of Jerry's kids...great article by a fellow student...Liberty brings in speakers from all corners of the globe and having Bernie Sanders speak at chapel will be a learning experience for everyone...People that believe in Jesus come from all walks of life, all races, all colors. Why would anyone that read this article attempt to criticize a college student excited about "learning"?  Isn't that why they go to college?  As for the people who don't believe in God, his son Jesus or believe that our world is a result of a big bang cosmic explosion.....Don't you appreciate the ability to believe your own way and not be punished for it?   You know why Christians are attacked in our modern day world?  Because we allow ourselves to be...Christians are easy targets for their beliefs and those that persecute know this fact...truth is, atheists are afraid of Christianity...they hate when a Christian takes a stand on something they don't agree with....pick a topic, you know it's true.     Those that believe in Jesus aren't perfect...just  forgiven.Good luck to Bernie Sanders...Go LU and keep training Champions for Christ.</comment>

<comment>So you speak for all Christians then?</comment>

<comment>Nope...just this one.</comment>

<comment>OK. It sounded like you confused your particular interpretation of Christianity with all of Christianity. I would submit that many Christians do not feel they are under attack by modern society. My sense is this is because their conception of Christianity has room for the Big Bang, evolution, treating gay people fairly, etc....so the changes and challenges thrown up y the modern world are not so threatening. Certainly Pope Francis exhibits this.</comment>

<comment>Atheists arent afraid of Christianity, were nervous about "Christians". Throughout history, "Christians" (and others) have had a habit of persecuting us, and sometimes roasting us.</comment>

<comment>What a fine example you set. Thanks for bringing this to the discussion.</comment>

<comment>Hey, you know what?  I  do  hate your religion!  I despise your smarmy, judgemental "righteousness".  I deplore your baseless and obviously hypocritical persecution complex.  I cannot tolerate your odious compulsion to force your fervent anti-intellectualism on the rest of the world.  I hate you!  If I could push a button that would instantly vanish America's conservative evangelicals, I would.  And it's all your own goddamned fault for making yourselves such a hateful, loathsome bunch through both actions and words.</comment>

<comment>Stop beating around the bush. Tell us how you really feel.</comment>

<comment>Sorry chief, forgot to engage the mandatory Liberal Tone Modulation for a sec there.  Sometimes they're just too hard to take, you know?</comment>

<comment>An expression of frothing rage is rarely persuasive.</comment>

<comment>Tell it to the whole dang internet.</comment>

<comment>You need to cut people a bit more slack than that. All evangelicals, and all conservative evangelicals, are not what you seem to think they are.</comment>

<comment>Obviously.  I'm sure any sufficiently large group has members who are personally decent people, even if the group itself has scant redeeming qualities.  I don't really care any more though about the wafer-thin silver lining of Christian fundamentalism, when it's obvious that the majority is rotten to the core.</comment>

<comment>I'd say it is misguided, and it causes a drag on social progress. I get very frustrated by it, but try not to succumb to hating a whole group of people over it.</comment>

<comment>It has the seed of renewal and restoration somewhere in it. It may yet surprise us, or people may move on from it. Take the long view.</comment>

<comment>Religion?  My religion is simply a personal relationship with Jesus Christ.  How am I hateful and loathsome?  A baseless and obviously hypocritical persecution complex?  Judging isn't for me...do whatchu like brother..I don't care.   I'm not here to judge you, but sounds like you are full of hate and pain.  feel bad for you bro!</comment>

<comment>Oh, I get you now brosef.  Judging isn't for you, except when convenient.  Are you genuinely unable to understand how your post is attacking atheists?  You posted on an article that had nothing to do with atheism to accuse them all of being intolerant bigots who hate and persecute you.  Do you understand what "projection" is?</comment>

<comment>I find it interesting that you found your way to this article?  Why would you?  Interested in LU?  My response which included my opinion on atheist was directed towards an enlightening comment referring to the "Magic Book".   Keep hating and hiding.</comment>

<comment>I understand this is difficult for you to comprehend, but some people actually want to learn about and from perspectives besides their own.</comment>

<comment>God Bless ya brother...hope your day gets better!</comment>

<comment>You often have these adolescent outburst hiding behind your real identity?   1905 comments and none of them public? Good stuff man.</comment>

<comment>I'd just let it roll off your back. He's not going to convince you or anyone who's following Christ, and he's not going to advance his own position. It's just noise. Let it pass.</comment>

<comment>I ignore the 'private' anonymous commentators, they're pussiess.</comment>

<comment>Self-righteouness was among the things espoused by your savior? How do you religious folk get yourselves so far from his teachings?</comment>

<comment>I would like to see a Republican political figure speaking at Liberty University expressly condemn racial segregation, even in the context of praising Jerry Falwell's belated repudiation of that odious practice.It would be a powerful "Sister Souljah" moment.  But I am not holding my breath.</comment>

<comment>Be careful what you wish for.They'll get someone to go speak about it because "Yay! Racism and racial segregation is over! And we're the Party of Lincoln!"The Minnesota GOP just finished their run at the MN State Fair, tweeting all the accomplishments of the Republican Party, including installing the first black Supreme Court Justice, Clarence Thomas. I kid you not. The sense of irony and history is lost on them.</comment>

<comment>Liberty University?*barfs*</comment>

<comment>Hey, you gonna clean that up, buddy, this is a family establishment. Okay. On second thought, it's not. Never mind.</comment>

<comment>The whole "Christianity is socialism" narrative thing is way off base.Can people selectively quote the bible to support it? Sure, in much the same way as people that do terrible things can find "support" for it the bible as well.</comment>

<comment>I understand your point about selectively quoting the Bible.That notwithstanding, I find "Christian" criticisms of socialism anomalous, in light of the example of the church at Jerusalem following the first Pentecost after the resurrection of Jesus:Acts 2:44-47 RSV.</comment>

<comment>I respectively beg to differ, I see it as a selective reading, one could just as easily make a case for jesus coming for war--with quotes from jesus himself if memory serves.Or any number of other things.It also differs in a number of significant ways. In the first place jesus was in charge and made all the decisions while he was alive, not in common, but one person running things.It also requires a selective and rather broad reading of socialism in general. For similar reasons. One could ask what specific kind of socialism is being compared to what specific form of Christianity?In not sure #46, #47, reflect socialism per-se.</comment>

<comment>You make an extremely persuasive case  that   Jesus would  strongly support the gutting of publicly owned companies - especially their non-productive pension funds - by private equity firms. Pensions are for the future, but the market is for today, being sufficient for the evil thereof.</comment>

<comment>He would also seemingly support the NRA.And likely be in favor of campaign finance reform--and the raising of money for political campaigns as one can't serve both his father and mammon, mammon being money.</comment>

<comment>Amen.</comment>

<comment>Atheism is the key, not anti-theism.</comment>

<comment>Yup. Im an Atheist, but Im quite sick of the Richard Dawkins Fan Club and their antics.</comment>

<comment>I just would like to see some mutual respect, the whole Golden Rule idea and such. I won't ever criticize someone for having faith, just don't expect me to play along, because I absolutely will not.</comment>

<comment>The only things I get "radical" about are religious encroachment in public affairs and demands of religious privelege when it comes to the rule of law. I have way too many religious family members, relatives and co-workers to get all hateful about it.</comment>

<comment>Yeah, I agree with you here.I want to be a faithful Christian, sure, but I also do not want--absolutely do not want--my government to be "Christian." For one, it might try to enforce a Christianity I don't like. And of course, it would be completely unconstitutional for the government to either enforce a religion or allow any religion to trump the beliefs or non-beliefs of anyone.Kim Davis is flat-out wrong, for example. She's an elected official of a secular government, and her name on the papers is her name as an elected official, not as "Kim Davis, some-kind-of-Christian, endorses this policy." Religious fundamentalists of every stripe who are opposed to certain government policies that they themselves must enforce have a very clear Constitutional path: they can resign.</comment>

<comment>You are one of my  favorite Christians;   you should become a leader of some sort and make the wacky, hateful Christians straighten up.</comment>

